Utah statutes.
63M-1-1401.   Board of Tourism Development.

(1)  There is created within the office the Board of Tourism Development.

(2)  The board shall advise the office on the office's planning, policies, and strategies and on trends and opportunities for tourism development that may exist in the various areas of the state.

(3)  The board shall perform other duties as required by Section 63M-1-1403.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

